Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.156.010

Joint center for deployment and research in earth-abundant materials.

The joint center for deployment and research in earth-abundant materials is created to:

(1) Establish a transformative program in earth-abundant materials to accelerate the development of next generation clean energy and transportation technologies in Washington;

(2) Establish a coordinated framework and deploy resources that can facilitate and promote multi-institution collaborations to drive research, development, and deployment efforts in the use of earth-abundant materials for manufactured clean technologies or recycling of advanced materials used in clean technologies; and

(3) Promote environmentally responsible processes in the areas of manufacturing and recycling of advanced materials used in clean technologies.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 20 s 2.]